Utah statutes.
48-2a-903.   Issuance of registration.

(1)  If the division finds that an application for registration conforms to law as to its form, and all requisite fees have been paid, it shall:

(a)  place on the original and the copy of the application a stamp or seal indicating the time, month, day, and year of the filing, the director of the division's signature and the division's seal, or facsimiles thereof, and the name of the division;

(b)  file in its office the signed original of the application; and

(c)  issue a certificate of registration to transact business in this state to which is attached the stamped copy.

(2)  The certificate of registration, together with the stamped copy of the application, shall be returned to the person who filed the application or his representative.

